libextern/espeak-ng-master/dictsource/af_rules
.group g
             g            x2
             g (g
             gala (si     x2%alA: // move default stress: Galasiër/-s
             gala (_      gA:l%a // fix g sound: gala/swemgala/gala-aand
             ga (lAC      x2%a // galant/galery/galon/galop
             gal (joen    x2%al // move default stress: galjoen/-e and compounds
             gamie (_     x2am'i // bi-/mono-/poligamie, etc.
             gamies       x2'A:mis  // bi-/mono-/poligamies/-e
          @) gans         x2A~ns // nasalise a: berggans/kolgans/-e
             gans (C      x2A~ns // nasalise a: gansveer/-vere and similar compounds
             ga (riep     x2%a // fix stress and a sound: Gariep(dam)
             gar (n       x2%ar // move default stress: garnaal/garnale/garneer/garnering and compounds
             garni (soen  x2%arn%i // fix stress: garnisoen and compounds
         @C) garye        x2%ar'eI@ // Fix stress: Bulgarye/Hongarye
          _) gas (A       x2''as_ // fix stress: gasaanleg/-aansteker/-installasie/-ontploffing
             gas (erig    x2A:s // long a and no pause: gaserig/-e/-heid
             gas (ie      x2A:s // long a and no pause: gasie/-s and compounds
             gas (ig      x2A:s // long a and no pause: gasig/-e/-heid
             gauteng      x2%aUtEN //Gauteng and compounds
          _) gh           g
             gh (_        x2 // Tulbagh and similar
          @) gheid        x2eIt    // traagheid/leegheid/droogheid/stugheid
             ghi (ta      g%i // move default stress: ghitaar and compounds/ghitare
             ght          _^_EN
          _) gade         x2A:d@ // gadeslaan/gadegeslaan
             garage       g@r'A:dZ
          _) gat (o       x2at_ // fix a sound and insert short break: gatom(keer)/gatoorkop
          @) gge (_       x2@ // logge/stugge
          _) gif (A       x2If_ // fix i sound: gifangel/-appel(tjie/-s)/-ui
             gim (naK     x2@m // move default stress: gimnas/-te
             gimna (siA   x2@mnA: // move default stress and lenghthen a sound: gimnasium/gimnasia
             glans        x2lans // glans not nasalised: glans/-ende/-papier, etc.
             glas (a      x2las_ // shorten a sound, short pause: glasafskorting/-albaster/-apparaat...
             glas (o      x2las_ // fix a sound and short break: glasoog/-ogie/-oë/-opaal/-oppervlakte
             gletser      x2l''Ets@r // fix 2nd e sound: gletserbeweging/-meer/-vorming/vergletsering, etc.
             glise (rien  gl@s@ // fix stress and g and vowel sounds: gliserien(-salf/-suur)
          @) gn (_        _^_EN // English words like design/foreign/resign/sign in Afrikaans text
          @) gnon (_      _^_FR // words ending in -gnon are French: Sauvignon/perignon...
             go (din      x2%o@ // move default stress: godin/-ne/-netjie, etc.
             godde (lo    x2%Od@ // move default stress: goddelose/goddeloos
             god (salig   x2%Ot // move default stress: godsalig/-e/-heid
             gods (dienstig x2%Ots // move default stress: godsdienstig/-e/-es/-heid
             gods (laster x2%Ots // move default stress: godslastering/-lik, etc.
             god (vr      x2%Ot // move default stress: godvresend/-e/godvrugtig/-e
             goeder (tie  x2%ud@r // move default stress: goedertiere(nheid)
             goed (gunst  x2%ut // move default stress: goedgunstig/-e/-lik
          _) goewer       x2%uv@r // move default stress: goewerneur and compounds
          A) gogie (_     x2ux2'i // demagogie/pedagogie
          A) gogies       x2'o@x2is // demagogies/-e/pedagogies/-e
             gomag (tig   x2Om_%ax2 // fix o sound and stress, pause: gomagtig/-e/-heid
          A) goog (_      x2'o@x2 // demagoog/pedagoog
             gor (dyn     x2%Or // move default stress: gordyn and compounds
             go (rilla    g%u // fix g and o sounds: gorilla and compounds
             goud (a@     x2@Ut_ // fix d sound: goudaandele/-aankope/-aar/-afsetting/-allooi...
             goud (o      x2@Ut_ // fix d sound: goudontdekking/-ontginning, etc.
             gourmet      go@rmeI: // gourmet(kos/-kombuis)
          A) goë          x2'u@ // demagoë/pedagoë
             grade (C     x2rA:d@ // fix e sound: gradedagseremonie/-dae/-lyn/retrogradewoordeboek
             grade (ring  x2r%ade@ // fix stress and vowel sounds: gradering and many compounds
             gra (fiek    x2r%a // fix stress and a sound: grafiek/-e /lyngrafiek, etc.
             gra (fiet    x2r%a // fix stress and a sound: grafiet and compounds
             grama (doe   x2r%am%a // move default stress: gramadoela/-s and compounds
             gramma (tik  x2r%ama // fix stress and 2nd a sound: grammatika and compounds
          _) gra (na      x2r@ // granaat(boom)/granate
             grandi (o    x2r%and%i // move default stress: grandioos/-ose
          _) gra (vA      x2r%a // fix stress and a sound: gravin/-ne/gravure
             grenadella   gr@n@d&la // fix stress and vowels: grenadella and compounds like -heining
             griekwa      x2rikwa // fix w sound and a sound in compounds: Griekwa/-land, etc.
       ouCa) gr (ootjie   x2r' // move default stress: ouma/oupagrootjie/-s
          _) graad (e     x2r%A:t_ // fix stress and d sound: graadeen(tjies)/-elfs
          _) graad (nege  x2r%A:t // fix stress: graadnege(tjies)
          _) graadse (s      x2r%A:tsE // fix stress and e sound: graadsesse/-sessies/-sesklas
          _) graad (t     x2r%A: // fix stress and drop d: graadtweetjies/-tiens/-twaalfs
          _) graad (vyf   x2r%A:t // move default stress: graadvyfs/graadvyfklas, etc.
             gra (niet    x2r%a // move default stress and fix a sound: graniet and compounds
             gra (sieu    x2r%a // fix stress and shorten a sound: grasieus/-e
          _) gras (A      x2ras_ // fix stress and a sound: graseter/grasoppervlakte/grasuie
          _) gra (sie     x2rA: // but restore default stress and long a: grasie
             gri (ffier   x2r@ // move default stress: griffier and compounds
          _) gri (mA      x2r@ // grimas/grimeer/-middel and other compounds/grimering
      agter) grond (i     x2rO:nt_ // fix d sound: agtergrondinligting/-informasie/-instrumente
             grond (o     x2rO:nt_ // fix d sound: grondonteiening/-oppervlakte, etc.
             grondwetlik  x2r%OntvEtl@k // move default stress: grondwetlik/-e/-heid
             grondwe (tK  x2rOntvE // restore default stress: grondwet/-te/-hof, etc.
             grondwet (a  x2rOntvEt_ // fix e sound and insert short pause: grondwetartikel/-s
             grotere      x2ro@t@r@ // fix vowel sounds and stress: grotere/-s
             guerrilla    g@r'Ila
             guillotine   g%il%utin // guillotine and compounds
             gus (ooi     x2Ws_ // fix u sound, pause: gusooi/-e
             guttu (ra    x2%Wt%W // move default stress: gutturaal/gutturale
             gésel        x2e@s@l // fix stress and e sounds: (ge)gésel/-ing

.group ge
             ge           x2@
          C) ge (_        g@
          _) gebede       x2@be@d@ // fix stress and vowel sounds: gebedeboek/-e/-tafel/-s
             gegesel      x2@x2e@s@l // fix middle e sound
          K) gele (_      x2e@l@ // fix stress and e sound: (eier)gele
          _) geler        x2e@l@r // stress and 1st e sound: geler/gelerig
          _) gell         x2&l
             gemel (d     x2@m&l // fix e sound: bo-/bowe-/laas-/meergemeld/-e
             gems         x2Ems // fix e sound: (baster)gemsbok/-bul/-ooi, etc.
             gene (_      x2e@n@ // gene/diegene
             gene (alo    x2%e@n%i // fix vowel sounds: genealogie/-s/-e, etc.
             gene (rA     x2@n@ // generaal/generasie/-s/genereer
             gene (rieK   x2@ne@ // fix stress and 2nd e sound: generies/-e
             genie (_     Z@ni: // genie and compounds ending in -genie
             genit (ieC   x2e@n@t // fix stress and vowel sounds: genetief/-tiewe
             genre        Z'A~nr@ //genre and compounds
          _) gens (C      x2E:ns // fix stress and e sound: gensbok and compounds
             genus        x2e@nWs // fix stress and e sound: genus/genusnaam/plantgenus and similar
          _) geo (s       x2%i%u // fix stress and -eo- sound: geosentries/geosfeer/geoskoop/geostaties
          _) ge (ossP2    x2@ // but ge- prefix: geossilleer/geossifiseer, etc.
         ni) ge (ri       x2'e@ //nigeriese etc.
             gese (_      x2'e@s@ //Portugese, and others
             gesp (etjie  x2Esp // fix e sounds: gespetjie/-s
             gespe (_     x2Esp@ // gespe and compounds
             gespes (_    x2Esp@s // gespes and compounds
             gewens (g    x2e@v@ns // (on)vergewensgesind/-e/-heid

             gewers (_    x2e@v@rs //fix gewers at word ends
          _) ge (@P2      x2@
             ge (k_       x2&
             ge (kg       x2& // fix stress and e sound: gekgeskeer
             ge (kk       x2&
             ge (kh       x2&
             geklede      x2@kle@d@ // fix e sound: wit-/swart-/groengeklede
             ge (kt       x2& // fix e sound: gektalery
             gekw (ord    x2&kv // fix stress, e and w sounds: gekwordens/gekwording
             genade       x2@nA:d@ // correct 2nd e in compounds: genadedood, etc.
             genad (etjie x2@nA:d // correct 2nd e in genadetjie
          _) ge (rC       x2& // gerf/gerwe/gert/gerber
          C) gerf         x2&rf // fix e sound: (gars/hawer/koring)gerf
          C) gerwe (_     x2&rv@ // fix e sound: (gars/hawer/koring)gerwe
          _) ger (ma      x2%&r // move default stress: germaan/germane
             geru (byn    x2%e@r%W // fix stress and vowel sounds: gerubyn/-e
             gesel (_     x2@s&l // metgesel/compounds ending with gesel
             geselle (_   x2@s&l@ // metgeselle/compounds ending in geselle
             geu (C       x2Y@ // geur/e/ig/geut
             gewe (_      x2'e@v@  // begewe/gegewe	
          @) gewende (_   x2'e@v@nd@
          @) gewend (_    x2'e@v@nt // insiggewend/deurslaggewend/liggewend
          @) gewend (ste  x2'e@v@nt // fix stress and e sound: toonaangewendste and similar
             gewel (d     x2@v&l //geweld/ig/gewelddadig
             gewel (f     x2@v&l //gewelf/boog
             gewel (w     x2@v'&l //gewelwe
